District of Columbia statutes.
39-123

Transfer of miscellaneous books to District public library.

Any books of a miscellaneous character no longer required for the use of any executive department, or bureau, or commission of the government, and not deemed an advisable addition to the Library of Congress, shall, if appropriate to the uses of the free public library of the District of Columbia, subject to applicable regulations under the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended, be turned over to that library for general use as a part thereof.

Feb. 25, 1903, 32 Stat. 865, ch. 755, § 1
Oct. 31, 1951, 65 Stat. 706, ch. 654, § 2(1)
1981 Ed., § 37-109.
1973 Ed., § 37-109.
The Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended, referred to in this section, is the Act of June 30, 1949, 63 Stat. 377, ch. 288, as amended.